Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-666
Violations; general penalty.

Any person who shall willfully violate any provision of the Employment Security Law or any order, rule, or regulation thereunder, the violation of which is made unlawful or the observance of which is required under the terms of such law, and for which a penalty is neither prescribed in such law nor provided by any other applicable statute, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each day such violation continues shall be a separate offense.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 16, p. 401;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-715;

R.S.1943, § 48-666;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 296;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 47.